Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Part 3

Sale of Tobacco

43-19-301. Commissioner of agriculture to enforce rules and regulations.

The commissioner of agriculture is vested with the power and authority and is charged with the duty of administering and enforcing this part, and has the authority to establish and enforce reasonable rules and regulations not inconsistent with this part, for the purpose of carrying out this part.

Acts 1949, ch. 141, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 6669.1 (Williams, § 6675.1); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2131.

Cross-References. Contracts to raise and sell farm products, title 43, ch. 15.

Cooperative marketing associations, title 43, ch. 16.

Promotion of leadership in agricultural and home economics programs at post-secondary institutions, title 49, ch. 7, part 7.

Sale of pecans, title 43, ch. 17.

Soybean promotion, title ch. 20.

43-19-302. Commingling of tobacco forbidden.

It is unlawful for any person to commingle, mix, place on same basket with other tobacco or in any other manner or means to handle tobacco so as to lose its identity, for the purpose of sale at auction, any looseleaf tobacco grown by one (1) producer with looseleaf burley tobacco grown by any other producer, or with that of the same producer after being placed on the looseleaf floor.

After tobacco is weighed and set upon the warehouse floor for sale, no basket of tobacco shall be moved, without the consent of the owner, from its place on the floor until sale is confirmed by the owner of the tobacco.

Acts 1949, ch. 141, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 6669.2 (Williams, § 6675.2); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2132.

43-19-303. Sales of burley tobacco regulated.

Sales of burley tobacco at warehouse or loosefloors shall be conducted so as to conform to one (1) of the following methods:

Sales to be at the rate of not more than ninety-seven thousand two hundred pounds (97,200 lbs.) per hour, per set of buyers; or

Sales to be at the rate of not more than three hundred sixty (360) baskets per hour, per set of buyers.

Acts 1949, ch. 141, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 6669.3 (Williams, § 6675.3); Acts 1965, ch. 115, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2133.

43-19-304. Warehouseman's record to be accurately maintained.

Any information pertaining to weights of tobacco sold, prices paid or amounts of tobacco handled, disseminated by any warehouseman, or a warehouseman's employees or agents shall be accurate and substantiated by records kept at the warehouse or loosefloor.

Acts 1949, ch. 141, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 6669.4 (Williams, § 6675.4); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2134.

43-19-305. Penalty for violation.

A violation of this part or the rules and regulations promulgated under this part is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1949, ch. 141, § 5; C. Supp. 1950, § 6669.5 (Williams, § 6675.5); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2135; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.